src/Korektor/sr-Latn.dic
Poljska/960
Priština/961
Ravni/962
Rasno/963
Resife/964
Rovni/962
Rumunija/965
Sarajevo/966
Skoplje/967
Srbija/968
Srem/969
Stolni/962
Tuzla/970
Turska/971
Uagadugu/972
Fidži/973
Čečenija/965
